dargwa.noun.lexd
PATTERNS
NounAbs [<n>:] NounInfl (Loc Orient (Dir))
NounAbs [<n>:] (Pl) Obl NounOblInfl (Loc Orient (Dir))

LEXICON NounAbs
dubur # гора

LEXICON Pl
<pl>:t
<pl>:be
<pl>:me
<pl>:ne
<pl>:e
<pl>:le
<pl>:he
<pl>:re
<pl>:-še
<pl>:ane
<pl>:lume
<pl>:ulme
<pl>:upːe
<pl>:urbe
<pl>:uˁpːe
<asc.pl>:qale

LEXICON NounInfl
<abs>:
<erg>:li
<gen>:{l}la
<adv>:le

LEXICON Obl
<obl>:li

LEXICON NounOblInfl
<dat>:z
<com>:cːele
<erg>:li
<gen>:{l}la

LEXICON Loc
<super>:ja
<sub>:gu
<ante>:sa
<in>:ħe
<inter>:cːe
<apud>:hira
<ad>:šːu
<loc>:na
<loc>:ni
<post>:hi

LEXICON Orient
<lat>:
<ess>:w | r | b | d #class indicator 
<el>:r
<trans>:tːi

LEXICON Dir
<up>:ha{le}
<down>:ka{le}
<hither>:se{le}
<thither>:de{le}
